Maine, session 132, LD585.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §10103, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2019, c. 306, §2, is further
amended to read:
4. Program funding. The board may apply for and receive grants from municipal,
state, federal and private sources for deposit into appropriate program funds, including
funds for both residential and business programs. The board may deposit in appropriate
program funds the proceeds of any bonds issued for the purposes of programs administered
by the trust. The board may receive and shall deposit in appropriate program funds revenue
resulting from any forward capacity market or other capacity payments from the a regional
transmission organization that may be attributable to those projects funded by those funds,
except that, from fiscal year 2019-20 to fiscal year 2024-25, such payments must be used
to promote or to supplement incentives that support beneficial electrification measures that
are cost-effective and reliably reduce electricity rates over the life of the measures,
including high-performance air source heat pump technology and deposited in the Heating
Fuels Efficiency and Weatherization Fund established in section 10119 electric vehicles.
The board shall deposit into appropriate program funds revenue transferred to the trust from
the energy infrastructure benefits fund pursuant to Title 5, section 282, subsection 9 for use
in accordance with subsection 4‑A. The board may also deposit any grants or other funds
received by or from any entity with which the trust has an agreement or contract pursuant
to this chapter if the board determines that receipt of those funds is consistent with the
purposes of this chapter.
Page 1 - 132LR0915(03)